Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 184.400 is amended to read:
184.400. (1) As used in ORS 184.400 to 184.408:
(a) “Incremental baseball tax revenues” means:
(A) The Oregon personal income tax revenues  that are generated from the Oregon personal in-
come tax liabilities shown on the income  tax returns filed by the members of a professional athletic
team engaged in Major League Baseball, including revenues that are  generated from the tax liabil-
ities of spouses of members of a professional  athletic team engaged in Major League Baseball if the
tax liabilities are reported on a joint return; or
(B) If Oregon personal income tax rates are reduced after the dates of  the grant agreements
described in ORS 184.404 and the grant  agreements provide that payments will be based on rates in
effect when the grant agreements are executed, the Oregon personal income tax liabilities,  as de-
scribed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, that  would have been due if the liabilities were cal-
culated using personal income tax rates in effect on the date of execution of the grant agreements.
(b) “Major league stadium” means a baseball stadium located in the City of Portland  that is
designed for use by a  Major League Baseball team and that has an estimated cost of [ $300 million]
$2 billion or more.
(c) “Member of a professional athletic  team” means an athlete or other individual rendering
service to a professional athletic team if the compensation of  the athlete or other individual exceeds
[$50,000] $100,000 in a tax year.
(d) “Tax liabilities” means the tax determined  under ORS chapter 316 for the tax year less the
credits allowed for purposes of ORS chapter 316 for the tax year.
(2) The Department of Revenue may adopt administrative rules  that the department determines
are necessary to:
(a) Further define the terms defined in this section in a manner consistent with this section;
(b) Implement the duties of the department under ORS 184.400 to 184.408; and
(c) Carry out the purposes of ORS 184.400 to 184.408.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 184.404 is amended to read:
184.404. (1) The Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, with  the ap-
proval of the State Treasurer, may enter into one or more agreements  on behalf of the State of
Enrolled Senate Bill 110 (SB 110-A) Page 1
Oregon  to  grant the incremental baseball tax revenues for a period of not more than 30 years. The
grant agreements must:
(a) Provide  that the granted amounts may be used only to pay for the costs of financing, devel-
oping, constructing and furnishing a major league stadium;
(b) Provide that:
(A) The total payments to the grantees are limited so that the grantees do  not receive, in the
aggregate, more than [ $150 million] $800 million for costs  of developing, constructing and furnishing
a major league stadium, plus the actual,  reasonable financing costs incurred by the grantees for that
amount; and
(B) If the incremental baseball tax revenues in a year substantially exceed the  amount reason-
ably required to amortize a loan of [ $150 million] $800 million  over a period of 30 years  with in-
terest, the excess may be retained by the state;
(c) Terminate when:
(A) The State of Oregon has  made all payments assigned to the state in the grant agreements
for the costs allowed under this subsection; and
(B) The  grantees have returned any amounts required to be returned under paragraph (i) of this
subsection;
(d) Require the  Director of the Department of Revenue to estimate incremental baseball tax
revenues, specify the methodology for estimating incremental  baseball tax revenues and notify the
Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services of  the estimated incremental baseball
tax revenues;
(e) Specify the methodology for determining actual incremental baseball tax revenues;
(f) Require the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  to request that
the Legislative Assembly appropriate an amount equal  to the estimated incremental baseball tax
revenues from the General Fund to the Major League Stadium Grant Fund established  in ORS
184.408 so that those moneys may be disbursed under the grant  agreements authorized by this sec-
tion;
(g) Require the Director of the Department of Revenue to  determine the actual incremental
baseball tax revenues and, if  the actual incremental baseball tax revenues exceed the estimated in-
cremental baseball tax revenues, notify  the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services of the excess;
(h) Require the Director  of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, if notified of an
excess under paragraph (g) of this subsection, to request that the Legislative  Assembly appropriate
an amount equal to the excess, adjusted for the limits and  retentions described in paragraph (b) of
this subsection, from the General Fund to the Major League Stadium Grant Fund so that those
moneys may be disbursed under the grant agreements authorized by this section;
(i) Require the grantees to return to the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative
Services for deposit in the General Fund amounts transferred to the grantees from the Major League
Stadium Grant Fund that exceed the actual incremental baseball tax revenues;
(j) Provide that the amounts requested for appropriations may not be  reduced because of any
reduction that may be enacted in Oregon personal income tax rates;
(k) Require the Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services to disburse
amounts in the Major League Stadium Grant Fund to the grantees on particular dates;
(L) Provide assurances of full and fair participation in the construction, furnishing and operation
of the major league stadium by minority-owned businesses, woman-owned businesses, veteran-owned
businesses and emerging small businesses;
(m) Provide  for the maximization of economic benefits for Oregon workers in the construction,
furnishing and operation of the major league stadium to the greatest extent permitted by law; and
(n) Require the State of Oregon and the grantees to take any other action  that the State
Treasurer, the Director of  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services or the Director of the
Department of Revenue determines is desirable to ensure that:
(A) The granted funds are used for the purposes described in ORS 184.400 to 184.408;
Enrolled Senate Bill 110 (SB 110-A) Page 2
(B) The grant agreements are administered efficiently and the interests of the State of Oregon
are protected; and
(C) The requests  for appropriation of amounts equal to the incremental baseball tax revenues
are made as described in ORS 184.400 to 184.408.
(2) The obligation of the State of Oregon, under ORS 184.400  to 184.408 and the grant agree-
ments authorized by this section,  to transfer estimated or actual incremental baseball tax revenues
to the Major League Stadium Grant Fund  is subject to an appropriation being made for that purpose
by the Legislative Assembly.  The State of Oregon is not liable to any party for any reason if the
Legislative Assembly fails to appropriate all or a portion of the amounts  requested under subsection
(1)(f) and  (h) of this section to the Major League Stadium Grant Fund. However, if the Legislative
Assembly does appropriate amounts for deposit in  the Major League Stadium Grant Fund and those
amounts are deposited in the Major League Stadium Grant Fund  pursuant to the grant agreements
authorized by this section, the obligation of the State of  Oregon to disburse the amounts in the
Major League Stadium Grant Fund is unconditional. The  grant agreements authorized by this sec-
tion are not a pledge of the full faith and credit or the taxing power of the State of Oregon,  and the
State of Oregon does not pledge its full faith  and credit or taxing power. The grant agreements do
not create an indebtedness of the State of Oregon in  violation of Article XI, section 7, of the Oregon
Constitution. If a provision of a grant agreement is  construed to have the effect of creating a debt
in violation of Article XI, section 7, of the Oregon Constitution, the provision is void.
(3) The Legislative Assembly does not have a legal obligation to appropriate any amounts  for
disbursement under the grant agreements authorized  by this section. However, the Legislative As-
sembly declares its current intention to appropriate amounts equal to the estimated  incremental
baseball tax revenues and  amounts equal to the amount by which the actual incremental baseball
tax revenues exceed the estimated incremental baseball tax revenues from the General Fund to  the
Major League Stadium  Grant Fund, as provided in ORS 184.400 to 184.408, so that the amounts may
be disbursed pursuant to the grant agreements authorized by this section.
(4) Before commencing negotiations on  a grant agreement authorized by this section, the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services shall obtain one or more agreements from benefited  parties
to pay the state’s costs associated with negotiating and executing the grant agreement.
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 110 (SB 110-A) Page 3